Utah statutes.
13-24-8.   Effect on other law.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this chapter displaces conflicting
tort, restitutionary, and other law of this state providing civil remedies for
misappropriation of a trade secret.
(2)  This chapter does not affect:
(a)  contractual remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a
trade secret;
(b)  other civil remedies that are not based upon misappropriation of a trade
secret; or
(c)  criminal remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade
secret.
